Hawaii statutes.
[§167-18] Approval of legislature,
appropriations. Funds for acquisition or construction of irrigation
facilities for each project, established by the board of agriculture under
sections 167-13, 167-14, 167-15, and 167-17, may be requested from the legislature,
as an appropriation to be repaid without interest to the general funds of the
State by the board from water tolls, acreage assessments, and other receipts of
the board within such period as may be specified in the act making the
appropriation. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next